dictionaries/apertium-ko-jp.jp.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<sdefs>
	<!-- verbs -->
	<sdef n="vblex"/>
	<sdef n="pol"/><!-- polite -->
	<sdef n="pres"/>
	<!-- nouns -->
	<sdef n="n"/>
	<sdef n="acc"/>
	<!-- <sdef n="pl"/> -->
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
	<pardef n="ひと__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>を</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
		<!-- <e><p><l>たち</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> -->
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="わか/る__vblex">
		<e><p><l>ります</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pol"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="か/う__vblex">
		<e><p><l>います</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pol"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="ひと"><i>ひと</i><par n="ひと__n"/></e>
	<e lm="うち"><i>うち</i><par n="ひと__n"/></e>
	<e lm="かう"><i>か</i><par n="か/う__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="わかる"><i>わか</i><par n="わか/る__vblex"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
